Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2004
Reformation of disposition.

Upon the petition of an interested person, a county court in a proceeding described in section 30-2211 or 30-3812 or a district court shall reform a disposition in the manner that most closely approximates the transferor's manifested plan of distribution and is within the ninety years allowed by subdivision (a)(2), (b)(2), or (c)(2) of section 76-2002 if:

(1) A nonvested property interest or a power of appointment becomes invalid under section 76-2002;

(2) A class gift is not but might become invalid under section 76-2002 and the time has arrived when the share of any class member is to take effect in possession or enjoyment; or

(3) A nonvested property interest that is not validated by subdivision (a)(1) of section 76-2002 can vest but not within ninety years after its creation.

Laws 1989, LB 377, § 4;

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 138.